Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.220

Street railways at expense of property benefited—Assessment of cost.

The cost and expense of any such improvement shall be distributed and assessed against all the property included in such local improvement district, in accordance with the special benefits conferred thereon.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.43.220. Prior: 1923 c 176 s 3; RRS s 9425-3.]